Utah statutes.
41-8-1.   Operation of vehicle by persons under 16 prohibited -- Exceptions for off-highway vehicles and off-highway implements of husbandry.

(1)  A person under 16 years of age, whether resident or nonresident of this state, may not operate a motor vehicle upon any highway of this state.

(2)  This section does not apply to a person operating:

(a)  a motor vehicle under a permit issued under Section 53-3-210.5;

(b)  an off-highway vehicle registered under Section 41-22-3 either:

(i)  on a highway designated as open for off-highway vehicle use; or

(ii)  in the manner prescribed by Subsections 41-22-10.3(1) through (3); or

(c)  an off-highway implement of husbandry in the manner prescribed by Subsections 41-22-5.5(3) through (5).



Amended by Chapter 36, 2008 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 250, 2008 General Session

